Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1505
Agreement; filing.

Within ten days after being signed by the parties, a copy of the agreement shall be filed with:

(1) The area office of the Bureau of Indian Affairs of the United States Department of the Interior having trust responsibility for each tribe the governing body of which is a party to the agreement or its successor agency;

(2) The county clerk of each county where one of the parties to the agreement is located, except that a copy shall not be required to be filed in Lancaster County if an agency or department of the state is a party to the agreement unless another party is located in such county;

(3) The Secretary of State; and

(4) Any affected tribal government.

Laws 1989, LB 508, § 5.